Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FEDERAL INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AND JOBS ACT.new text end new text begin $153,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) discretionary program match funding. This appropriation is subject to requirements contained in Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 4, section 111. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end